District of Columbia statutes.
21-2404.01

Registration of guardianship orders.

If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the appointment of a guardian is not pending in the District of Columbia, the guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship order in the District by filing as a foreign judgment in the Superior Court certified copies of the order and letters of office.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 401 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.

Editor's Notes